Wyoming statutes. Title 15 Cities and Towns
Article 8. Off-Street Parking

§ 15-1-801.
Construction authorized; financing; security.

The governing body of any city or town may construct and provide off-street parking facilities to reduce street congestion.

A city or town may:

Appropriate by ordinance all or any portion of the revenues derived from the use of parking meters for the creation, purchase, lease, construction and maintenance of off-street parking facilities;

Pledge on-street parking meter funds, or proceeds of gasoline taxes in the manner and subject to the limitations prescribed by W.S.

15-6-437

, as additional security for the bonds authorized in paragraph (iii) of this subsection;

Issue revenue bonds for the creation, purchase, lease, construction and maintenance of off-street parking facilities, or refunding revenue bonds to refund, pay or discharge all or a part of its off-street parking facility revenue bonds, including interest. The procedure for issuing revenue or refunding revenue bonds is the same as that prescribed by W.S.

35-2-424

through

35-2-436

, as from time to time amended;

If parking meters are not used, use any other funds available to carry out the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 112, §§ 101, 102, 103, 104; W.S. 1957, §§ 15.1-101, 15.1-102, 15.1-103, 15.1-104; Laws 1967, ch. 146, § 1; 1971, ch. 169, § 1; 1973, ch. 121, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§

15-1-901

to

15-1-904

; Laws 1980, ch. 38, § 1; 1981, ch. 143, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to eminent domain generally, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

and Rule 71.1, W.R.C.P.

As to powers of local authorities relative to motor vehicles and traffic generally, see §§

31-5-109

and

31-5-110

.

As to stopping, standing and parking generally, see §§

31-5-501

to

31-5-512

.

Procedure. —

City's use of a resolution, rather than an ordinance, to authorize revenue bonds to finance construction of a parking facility, was in compliance with Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

15-1-801

, which unambiguously authorizes the city to issue revenue bonds for parking facilities by following the procedures set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §§

35-2-424

through

35-2-436

. Mathewson v. City of Cheyenne, 2003 WY 10, 61 P.3d 1229,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2003).

Applied

in

Town of Lovell v. Menhall, 386 P.2d 109,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 1963).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Establishment or operation of off-street public parking facilities, 8 ALR2d 373.

Permissible use of funds from parking meters, 83 ALR2d 625.

§ 15-1-802.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1995, ch. 178, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1965, ch. 112, § 105, related to prohibited products and services.